Missouri, session 2026, HB2115.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.025, to read as follows:
170.025. 1. Each school district and charter school shall ensure that:
(1) Each elementary school under the control of such school district or charter
school provides instruction that includes cursive writing, in a manner determined by the
district or charter school, so that students can demonstrate an ability to read documents
written in cursive and create readable documents through legible cursive handwriting;
and
(2) Beginning in the 2028-29 school year and for all subsequent school years,
each student in grade five takes a teacher-constructed test to demonstrate the student's
competency in both reading and writing cursive.
2. Each local school board or governing board of a charter school shall be
responsible for the approval and adoption of curriculum and standards for competency
that will be used by the school district or charter school.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.